Louisiana, session 2026, HB157.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 51:470.2(introductory paragraph) and (3) through (12), 470.3(F),
470.4(D) through (G), and 470.6(B) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
51:470.2(13) and 470.4(H) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§470.2. Definitions
As used in this Subpart, the following words and phrases shall have the
following meanings:
* * *
(3) "Artificial intelligence" means an artificial system developed in computer
software, physical hardware, or other context that solves tasks requiring human-like
perception, cognition, planning, learning, communication, or physical action.
(4) "Commercial purposes" means the use of an individual's identity for any
of the following purposes:
(a) On or in connection with products, merchandise, goods, services,
commercial activities, or performances.
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-637 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 157
(b) For advertising, soliciting, or promoting products, merchandise, goods,
services, commercial activities, or performances.
(c) For the purpose of fundraising.
(4) (5) "Digital replica" means a computer-generated or electronic
reproduction of a professional performer's likeness or voice that is so realistic as to
be indistinguishable from the actual likeness or voice of the professional performer.
"Digital replica" does not include the making or duplication of another recording that
consists entirely of an independent fixation of other sounds, even though the sounds
imitate or simulate the voice of the professional performer.
(5) (6) "Expressive work" means such work as a play, book, magazine,
newspaper, musical composition, audiovisual work, radio or television program,
work of art, or a dramatic, literary, or musical work, if it is fictional or nonfictional
entertainment, a work of political or newsworthy value, or an advertisement or
commercial announcement for any of these works.
(6) (7) "Identity" means an individual's name, voice, signature, photograph,
image, likeness, or digital replica.
(7) (8) "Individual" means a living natural person domiciled in Louisiana this
state or a deceased natural person who was domiciled in Louisiana this state at the
time of the individual's death.
(8) (9) "Information content provider" means any person or entity that is
responsible, in whole or in part, for the creation or development of information
provided through the internet or any other interactive computer service.
(9) (10) "Interactive computer service" means any information service,
system, or access software provider that provides or enables computer access by
multiple users to a computer server, including specifically a service or system that
provides access to the internet and such systems operated or services offered by
libraries or educational institutions.
(10) (11) "Internet" means the international computer network of both
federal and nonfederal interoperable packet switched data networks.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-637 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 157
(11) (12) "Performance" means the use of a digital replica to substitute for
a performance by a professional performer in a work in which the professional
performer did not actually appear.
(12) (13) "Professional performer" means an individual who, for gain or
livelihood, is or was regularly engaged in acting, singing, dancing, playing a musical
instrument, or appearing on a news broadcast as an anchor or reporter.
* * *
§470.3. Property right in an individual's identity
* * *
F. The rights provided by this Subpart apply to all individuals whether or not
the individual died before, on, or after August 1, 2022. If the individual died before
August 1, 2022, the rights are considered to have existed on and after the date the
individual died. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a claim for a violation of an
individual's identity rights may shall not be asserted under pursuant to this Subpart
unless the alleged act or event of violation occurs after August 1, 2022. However,
a claim for a violation of an individual's identity rights by artificial intelligence shall
not be asserted pursuant to this Subpart unless the alleged act or event of violation
occurs after August 1, 2026.
* * *
§470.4. Misappropriation of identity
* * *
D. It is a violation of this Subpart to use artificial intelligence to generate or
create audiovisual work of an individual's identity for a commercial purpose without
having first obtained consent from the individual or the individual's authorized
representative.
E. A person who does any of the following shall be deemed to have
submitted to the jurisdiction of this state:
(1) Engages in conduct within Louisiana this state that is prohibited under
pursuant to this Subpart.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-637 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 157
(2) Creates or causes to be created within this state products, merchandise,
goods, services, or other materials prohibited under pursuant to this Subpart.
(3) Transports or causes to be transported into this state products,
merchandise, goods, or other materials created or used in violation of this Subpart.
(4) Knowingly causes advertising or promotional material created or used
in violation of this Subpart to be published, distributed, exhibited, or disseminated
within Louisiana.
E.(1) F.(1) In addition to any other remedy authorized by law, a person who
violates an individual's identity rights may be liable for the greater of one thousand
dollars and the actual damages, and to the extent not duplicative of the plaintiff's
compensatory damages, the disgorgement of profits derived from the unauthorized
use of the individual's identity. For purposes of calculating such profits, the plaintiff
is only required to prove the gross revenue attributable to the unauthorized use, and
the defendant is required to prove properly deductible expenses.
(2) A court of competent jurisdiction may grant the plaintiff, in a proceeding
under pursuant to this Section, a temporary restraining order or an order for
injunctive relief.
F. G. A court may award reasonable attorney fees, costs, and expenses to the
prevailing party in an action under pursuant to this Subpart.
G. H. Any suit arising out of the alleged offending use of a digital replica,
expressive work, identity, or performance, or brought against a newspaper, broadcast
outlet, media outlet, online news outlet, news publication, or other media pursuant
to this Subpart shall be subject to the provisions of Code of Civil Procedure Article
971, and any alleged violation of this Subpart shall be presumed an act in furtherance
of a person's right of petition or free speech under the Constitution of the United
States of America or the Constitution of Louisiana in connection with a public issue
in accordance with Code of Civil Procedure Article 971.
* * *
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-637 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 157
§470.6. Construction and applicability
* * *
B.(1) The property rights granted by this Subpart vest with an individual or
the individual's authorized representative on August 1, 2022, except as provided by
Paragraph (2) of this Subsection.
(2) The property rights granted by this Subpart vest with an individual or the
individual's authorized representative on August 1, 2026, if the claims result from
misuse of an individual's identity by artificial intelligence.